Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1319
Educational telecommunications; operation
on noncommercial basis; exceptions; service available to all schools and colleges;
costs.

All telecommunications facilities operated or supervised
by the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission shall be operated
at all times on a noncommercial basis, except that revenue may be generated
from other nonprofit or commercial sources through contractual arrangements
involving excess transmission spectrum or transmission and production facilities.
All contractual arrangements shall be based on sound business principles that
are made in the best interest of the State of Nebraska. The commission may
also enter into partnerships with public or private entities for the purpose
of jointly building and operating tower and other transmission structures.
All telecommunications facilities operated or supervised by the commission
shall not produce or be involved in the production of commercials and shall
not be involved in the distribution or retransmission of national commercial
and subscription television channels.

Operational and administrative service pertinent to the production and
utilization of educational telecommunications services shall be made available to all schools
and colleges of Nebraska on the basis of the actual cost of production exclusive
of general overhead expense.

Laws 1963, c. 468, § 5, p. 1499;

Laws 1984, LB 645, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2105;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 975;

Laws 1996, LB 1138, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 860, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 24;

Laws 2014, LB692, § 6.